Maine, session 132, LD341.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §13155, sub-§5-B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 526, §2, is further
amended to read:
5-B. Oversized ATV; exception. A person may not register an oversized ATV except
as provided in this subsection. A resident who has registered an oversized ATV prior to
January 1, 2022 may continue to register that oversized ATV upon payment of the fee
specified in subsection 5, paragraph A, and upon a transfer of ownership of that registered
oversized ATV, the new owner may also register that oversized ATV upon payment of the
fee specified in subsection 5, paragraph A. Registration is not required for an oversized
ATV operated by a person on the land of another if written permission is received from the
landowner or lessee of the land and the person is engaged solely in a business activity, other
than a business activity involving recreational use of the oversized ATV. For purposes of
this subsection, "oversized ATV" means an ATV that is wider than 65 inches or weighs
more than 2,000 3,500 pounds according to the manufacturer's specifications.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.